Tennessee, session 114, HB0880.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-1-302, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
The department of education shall compile a comprehensive list of all of the state
board-approved educator preparation providers, and educator preparation providers
approved by the state board and the department of education, teacher training
requirements for licensed educators to teach students in any of the grades kindergarten
through twelve (K-12) who are employees of an LEA or public charter school. By June
30 of each year, the department shall publish the list on the department's website and
submit the list to the education committee of the senate and the committee of the house
of representatives having jurisdiction over educator licensure.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0880
002663
- 1 -